South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3091.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-4-60(C) of the S.C. Code before the numbered items is amended to read: (C) When the court has, afterAfter a hearing for any order of protection, issued an order of protection, it may, in additionthe court may: SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----